Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB746.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of November 24, 1976 (P.L.1176, No.261), known as the Manufactured Home Community Rights Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 11.4. Residents' Right to Purchase Manufactured Home Community.--(a) When a manufactured home community owner markets or offers the community for sale, or receives a bona fide purchase offer that the community owner intends to accept or counter, the community owner shall notify prospective purchasers that the sale, acceptance or counteroffer is subject to the residents' right to purchase the community under this 123456789101112131415161718 section. Notwithstanding any law or agreement to the contrary, an agreement for the sale of a manufactured home community shall be subject to the residents' right to purchase under this section and shall not include terms that favor a nonresident purchaser or impose penalties on the community owner for complying with the requirements under this section.(b) The following shall apply:(1) At least 90 days before entering into an agreement to sell a manufactured home community, the manufactured home community owner shall provide written notice of the opportunity to purchase by certified mail to all of the following:(i) Each resident. (ii) The resident association, if a resident association exists.(iii) The Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency. DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.(iv) The local housing authority.(v) The municipality where the community is located.(2) The notice under paragraph (1) shall specify the price, terms and conditions of the proposed sale and state that residents have 90 days to submit a competing offer.(c) The following shall apply:(1) A resident association representing at least 25% of the manufactured home spaces or a nonprofit organization, including a community development corporation, housing authority or redevelopment authority acting on behalf of the residents of at least 25% of the spaces, may exercise the residents' right to purchase the community under this section.(2) To exercise the right under paragraph (1), the resident association or nonprofit organization shall deliver to the 20250SB0746PN1793 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 community owner, within the 90-day period under subsection (b)(1), a written notice of intent to make an offer to purchase the community. The resident association or nonprofit organization may file a copy of the notice under this paragraph with the recorder of deeds.(d) If a notice of intent is timely delivered under subsection (c)(2), the resident association or nonprofit organization shall have the right to purchase the community by delivering to the community owner, within 120 days of the notice of intent, an executed offer matching the price with substantially the same terms and conditions in the notice under subsection (b)(2). During the 120-day period under this subsection, the community owner shall not accept any other purchase offer for the community.(e) Within 10 days of a written request from the resident association or nonprofit organization, the community owner shall provide documents, data and other information relevant to the sale of the community and cooperate with requests for inspections, testing or surveys to enable the resident association or nonprofit organization to prepare an offer under subsection (d).(f) The community owner shall negotiate the sale of the community in good faith, including evaluating offers without regard to financing or payment type or contingencies, including appraisals or title work, and provide a written response within seven days of receiving an offer to the prospective purchaser. If an offer is rejected by the community owner, the response shall explain the rejection and specify terms required for acceptance of the offer.(g) The following shall apply:20250SB0746PN1793 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) All time periods specified in this section may be extended by mutual agreement between the community owner and the prospective purchaser.(2) The 120-day period to deliver an offer under subsection (d) shall be tolled during the following:(i) A delay caused by the community owner failing to comply with subsection (e) within 10 days.(ii) A reasonable delay in obtaining financing, inspection, testings or surveys beyond the control of the resident association or nonprofit organization.(iii) The filing of a nonfrivolous complaint with the agency alleging a violation of this section until the agency issues a written decision or the parties sign a settlement agreement approved by the agency.(h) The following shall apply:(1) If a notice of intent is not timely delivered under subsection (c)(2), the requirements under this section shall not apply to the community owner unless the community owner later offers the community for sale at a lower price or on substantially different terms than specified in the original notice.(2) If the community owner offers the community at a lower price or substantially different terms after the 90-day period under subsection (c)(2) or receives an offer that the community owner intends to accept, the resident association or nonprofit organization shall receive notice of the revised terms and have 60 days from receipt to deliver an executed offer matching the revised price, terms and conditions.(i) A lease for a space in a manufactured home community shall include a clause notifying residents of their right under 20250SB0746PN1793 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this section to offer to purchase the community before the sale of the community.(j) The Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency shall post model lease language and notices to assist compliance with this section on the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency's publicly accessible Internet website.(J) THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT SHALL POST MODEL LEASE LANGUAGE AND NOTICES TO ASSIST WITH COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION ON THE PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.(k) The residents' right to purchase a community under this section shall constitute a property interest. Noncompliance with this section shall be grounds to set aside the sale or transfer of title of the community if an action to enforce compliance with this section is filed within 90 days after the recording of the transfer instrument.(l) This section shall not apply to any of the following: (1) Sales to a spouse, parent, sibling, aunt, uncle, first cousin or legally recognized child of the community owner.(2) Transfers by gift, devise or operation of law.(3) Foreclosure.(4) Eminent domain.(m) As used in this section, the term "sale" includes a master lease of the community.Section 2. Section 16.1 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 16.1. Remedies.--* * *(c) Residents, a resident association representing at least 25% of the manufactured home space or a nonprofit organization as specified under section 11.4(c)(1) shall have the right to 20250SB0746PN1793 - 5 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 seek injunctive relief to enforce compliance with the requirements of section 11.4, including, but not limited to, the community owner's obligations to provide notice, disclose information and negotiate in good faith as required under section 11.4.(d) Residents, a resident association representing at least 25% of the manufactured home spaces, a nonprofit organization as specified under section 11.4(c)(1) or the agency may initiate an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to set aside the sale or transfer of title of a manufactured home community if the community owner fails to comply with the requirements of section 11.4. The action must be filed within 90 days after the recording of the transfer instrument as required under section 11.4(k).(e) In addition to all other powers and remedies under this act, if a community owner attempts to sell or transfer title to a manufactured home community without complying with section 11.4, the agency may initiate an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to impose a civil penalty on the community owner not to exceed 30% of the sale price or the listing price of the community, whichever is greater. The court shall distribute 50% of the civil penalty awarded under this subsection to the agency and the remaining 50% pro rata to the residents of the community as of the date of the violation of section 11.4.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0746PN1793 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425